Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.240

Prior civil or criminal liability not affected.

The enactment of this chapter shall not have the effects of terminating, or in any way modifying any liability, civil or criminal, which shall already be in existence on February 21, 1961.

[ 1961 c 29 s 24.]